Hawaii statutes.
[§329D-11] Advertising and packaging.
(a) The department shall establish standards regarding the advertising and
packaging of marijuana and manufactured marijuana products; provided that the
standards, at a minimum, shall require the use of packaging that:

(1) Is child-resistant and opaque so that the product
cannot be seen from outside the packaging;

(2) Uses only black lettering on a white background
with no pictures or graphics;

(3) Is clearly labeled with the phrase "For
medical use only";

(4) Is clearly labeled with the phrase "Not for
resale or transfer to another person";

(5) Includes instructions for use and "use by
date";

(6) Contains information about the contents and
potency of the product;

(7) Includes the name of the production center where
marijuana in the product was produced, including the batch number and date of
packaging;

(8) Includes a barcode generated by tracking
software; and

(9) In the case of a manufactured marijuana product, a
listing of the equivalent physical weight of the marijuana used to manufacture
the amount of the product that is within the packaging, pursuant to section
329D-9(c).

(b) Any capsule, lozenge, or pill
containing marijuana or its principal psychoactive constituent
tetrahydrocannabinol shall be packaged so that one dose, serving, or single
wrapped item contains no more than ten milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol;
provided that no manufactured marijuana product that is sold in a pack of
multiple doses, servings, or single wrapped items, nor any containers of oils,
shall contain more than a total of one hundred milligrams of
tetrahydrocannabinol per pack or container. [L 2015, c 241, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next